Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
705

INCHOATE
CRIMES

Part I. Criminal Attempt

Section

705-500 Criminal attempt

705-501 Criminal attempt; attempting to aid
another

705-502 Grading of criminal attempt

Part II. Criminal Solicitation

705-510 Criminal solicitation

705-511 Immunity, irresponsibility, or
incapacity of a party

to criminal solicitation

705-512 Grading of criminal solicitation

Part III. Criminal Conspiracy

705-520 Criminal conspiracy

705-521 Scope of conspiratorial relationship

705-522 Conspiracy with multiple criminal
objectives

705-523 Immunity, irresponsibility, or
incapacity of a party

to criminal conspiracy

705-524 Venue in criminal conspiracy
prosecutions

705-525 Duration of conspiracy

705-526 Grading of criminal conspiracy

Part IV. General Provisions Relating to
Inchoate

Offenses

705-530 Renunciation of attempt, solicitation,
or

conspiracy; affirmative defense

705-531 Multiple convictions

Note

L 2001, c 91, §4 purports to amend this chapter.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next